District of Columbia statutes.
2-405

Effective date.

Sections 2-402 to 2-405 shall take effect from and after February 11, 1929, but nothing herein contained shall be construed as prohibiting the Mayor of the District of Columbia from proceeding according to the terms and provisions hereof to settle any claim or suit pending on February 11, 1929, irrespective of the date of presentation of the claim to the Mayor of the District of Columbia or the date of the filing of the suit.

Feb. 11, 1929, 45 Stat. 1161, ch. 173, § 4

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1205.
1973 Ed., § 1-905.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government